Massachusetts, session 194th, H4661.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding sections 17 and 17A of chapter 138 of the General
Laws, the licensing authority of the city of Salem may convert 1 seasonal license for the sale of
all alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises to an annual license for the sale of wine and
malt beverages and cordials to be drunk on the premises under section 12 of chapter 138
currently issued to Amazing Pizza LLC d/b/a Amazing Pizza located at 62 Wharf Street in the
city of Salem. The license converted under this section shall be subject to all of said chapter 138
except sections 17 and 17A.
(b) Notwithstanding sections 17 and 17A of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the
licensing authority of the city of Salem may convert 1 seasonal license for the sale of all
of 3

alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises to an annual license for the sale of all alcoholic
beverages to be drunk on the premises under section 12 of chapter 138 currently issued to
Maitland Farm LLC d/b/a Maitland Farm Kitchen and Spirits located at 84 Derby Street in the
city of Salem. The license converted under this section shall be subject to all of said chapter 138
except sections 17 and 17A.
The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of the license converted pursuant to
this section to any other location but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same
location if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue
and a letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in
good
standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have
been paid.
If the license converted pursuant to this section is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use
at the location of original issuance, it shall be returned physically, with all of the legal rights,
privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority and the licensing
authority may then grant the license to a new applicant at the same location under the same
conditions as specified in this act.
SECTION 2. (a) The city of Salem shall charge a fee for the conversion of the licenses
authorized in section 1 which shall be paid by the licensee at the time of issuance unless the
licensing authority agrees to enter into a contract with the licensees to allow the division of the
fee into multiple payments over time from the licensee. If the city elects to accept multiple
of 3

payments over time from the licensees, the option shall be made available, upon request, to all
qualified applicants for a license.
(b) Any fee collected by the city of Salem for the licenses converted pursuant to section 1
which is greater than the amount of the fee charged for an annual renewal of a similar license
issued by the city shall be deposited into the city's economic development account and expended
by it in a manner consistent with the purposes of such account.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3